Utah statutes.
10-6-144.   City treasurer -- Warrants -- Order of payment.
In the absence of appropriate monies, as set forth in Section 10-6-140, the
treasurer shall pay all warrants in the order in which presented and as money
becomes available for payment thereof in the appropriate funds of the city.
The treasurer shall note upon the back of each warrant presented the date of
presentation and the date of payment.
